Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,134
Appropriation of funds; grant; funding; matching funds.

The Legislature may appropriate funds to the Department of Economic Development which shall be awarded as a grant to the private, nonprofit organization selected pursuant to subsection (3) of section 81-12,133 to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Operational Assistance Act. The department may receive funds from local or federal government, private foundations, or other sources. The private, nonprofit organization shall provide matching funds of at least one-third of all funds appropriated for the Nebraska Operational Assistance Program. The private, nonprofit organization may provide any part of the matching funds as an in-kind contribution.

Laws 2007, LB425, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 195.
April 8, 2026